Massachusetts, session 194th, H1573.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Section 110 “INSPECTIONS” of 780 CMR: 
Massachusetts Amendments to the International Building Code 2021, or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, a building official as defined under 780 CMR, Chapter 2: Definitions, 
section 202.1 may appoint a designee for the sole purpose of conducting inspections of NON-
Primary owner occupied and Primary owner occupied short-term rentals in accordance with 780 
CMR Table 110.7. 
SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect upon its passage.